South Dakota, session 2026, HB1270.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to a NEW CHAPTER in title 16:
The Legislature hereby creates a legal apprenticeship pathway to licensure as an
attorney in the state of South Dakota.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to a NEW CHAPTER in title 16:
The Legislature hereby creates a legal apprenticeship program if the following
conditions are met:
(1) The applicant is a graduate of the University of South Dakota School of Law;
(2) The applicant is a resident of the state of South Dakota at the time of
commencement of the apprenticeship and completion; and
(3) The applicant successfully completes six hundred seventy-five hours of supervised
apprenticeship under a qualified supervising attorney within the state of South
Dakota.
A supervising attorney may include an attorney employed by or associated with a
government legal department, or any attorney engaged in the private practice of law.
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to a NEW CHAPTER in title 16:
A supervising attorney shall:
(1) Be licensed and in good standing to practice law in this state; and
(2) Have engaged in the full-time practice of law for not less than seven years.
Section 4. That a NEW SECTION be added to a NEW CHAPTER in title 16:
The supervising attorney shall certify that:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.761.26 2 1270
(1) The apprentice has faithfully completed six hundred seventy-five hours of
supervised apprenticeship within a period not to exceed one year;
(2) The apprentice has demonstrated satisfactory performance of assigned tasks and
responsibilities; and
(3) The apprentice has demonstrated knowledge and proficiency in legal ethics and
professional responsibility.
Section 5. That a NEW SECTION be added to a NEW CHAPTER in title 16:
Prior to licensure, each applicant shall undergo and successfully pass a criminal
background investigation pursuant to the provisions of § 16-16-2.6.
Section 6. That a NEW SECTION be added to a NEW CHAPTER in title 16:
Upon satisfactory completion of all apprenticeship requirements, certification by
the supervising attorney, and fulfillment of all statutory conditions, the apprentice shall
be granted a license to practice law in this state.
Section 7. That a NEW SECTION be added to a NEW CHAPTER in title 16:
As a condition of licensure under this apprenticeship pathway, each newly licensed
attorney shall perform a minimum of fifty hours of pro bono legal services per year for a
period of five years following the date of licensure.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.